Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.007

Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the legislature in enacting chapter 99, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. to establish (1) a system for the imposition of prompt and effective sanctions against nursing homes in violation of the laws and regulations of this state relating to patient care; (2) an inspection and reporting system to insure that nursing homes are in compliance with state statutes and regulations pertaining to patient care; and (3) a mechanism to insure that licenses are issued to or retained by only those nursing homes that meet state standards for resident health and safety.

[ 1981 1st ex.s. c 2 s 14; 1975 1st ex.s. c 99 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective dates—1981 1st ex.s. c 2: See notes following RCW 18.51.010.